Ohio, session 136, HB686.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 2101.16, 2101.162, 2111.03, 2111.121, 2111.51, and 2113.031 be amended and section 3109.044 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 2101.16. (A) Except as provided in section 2101.164 of the Revised Code, the fees enumerated in this division shall be charged and collected, if possible, by the probate judge and shall be in full for all services rendered in the respective proceedings: 1 2 3 A (1) Account, in addition to advertising charges B ___________________________________________________ $12.00 C Waivers and proof of notice of hearing on account, per page, minimum one dollar D ___________________________________________________ $1.00 E (2) Account of distribution, in addition to advertising charges F ___________________________________________________ $7.00 G (3) Adoption of child, petition for H ___________________________________________________ $20.00 I (4) Alter or cancel contract for sale or purchase of real property, complaint to J ___________________________________________________ $20.00 K (5) Application and order not otherwise provided for in this section or by rule adopted pursuant to division (E) of this section L ___________________________________________________ $5.00 M (6) Appropriation suit, per day, hearing in N ___________________________________________________ $20.00 O (7) Birth, application for registration of P ___________________________________________________ $7.00 Q (8) Birth record, application to correct R ___________________________________________________ $5.00 S (9) Bond, application for new or additional T ___________________________________________________ $5.00 U (10) Bond, application for release of surety or reduction of V ___________________________________________________ $5.00 W (11) Bond, receipt for securities deposited in lieu of X ___________________________________________________ $5.00 Y (12) Certified copy of journal entry, record, or proceeding, per page, minimum fee one dollar Z ___________________________________________________ $1.00 AA (13) Citation and issuing citation, application for AB ___________________________________________________ $5.00 AC (14) Change of name, petition for AD ___________________________________________________ $20.00 AE (15) Claim, application of administrator or executor for allowance of administrator's or executor's own AF ___________________________________________________ $10.00 AG (16) Claim, application to compromise or settle AH ___________________________________________________ $10.00 AI (17) Claim, authority to present AJ ___________________________________________________ $10.00 AK (18) Commissioner, appointment of AL ___________________________________________________ $5.00 AM (19) Compensation for extraordinary services and attorney's fees for fiduciary, application for AN ___________________________________________________ $5.00 AO (20) Competency, application to procure adjudication of AP ___________________________________________________ $20.00 AQ (21) Complete contract, application to AR ___________________________________________________ $10.00 AS (22) Concealment of assets, citation for AT ___________________________________________________ $10.00 AU (23) Construction of will, complaint for AV ___________________________________________________ $20.00 AW (24) Continue decedent's business, application to AX ___________________________________________________ $10.00 AY Monthly reports of operation AZ ___________________________________________________ $5.00 BA (25) Declaratory judgment, complaint for BB ___________________________________________________ $20.00 BC (26) Deposit of guardianship nomination BD ___________________________________________________ $10.00 BE (26)(27) Deposit of will BF ___________________________________________________ $5.00 BG (27)(28) Designation of heir BH ___________________________________________________ $20.00 BI (28)(29) Distribution in kind, application, assent, and order for BJ ___________________________________________________ $5.00 BK (29)(30) Distribution under section 2109.36 of the Revised Code, application for an order of BL ___________________________________________________ $7.00 BM (30)(31) Docketing and indexing proceedings, including the filing and noting of all necessary documents, maximum fee, fifteen dollars BN ___________________________________________________ $15.00 BO (31)(32) Exceptions to any proceeding named in this section, contest of appointment or BP ___________________________________________________ $10.00 BQ (32)(33) Election of surviving partner to purchase assets of partnership, proceedings relating to BR ___________________________________________________ $10.00 BS (33)(34) Election of surviving spouse under will BT ___________________________________________________ $5.00 BU (34)(35) Fiduciary, including an assignee or trustee of an insolvent debtor or any guardian or conservator accountable to the probate court, appointment of BV ___________________________________________________ $35.00 BW (35)(36) Foreign will, application to record BX ___________________________________________________ $10.00 BY Record of foreign will, additional, per page BZ ___________________________________________________ $1.00 CA (36)(37) Forms when supplied by the probate court, not to exceed CB ___________________________________________________ $10.00 CC (37)(38) Heirship, complaint to determine CD ___________________________________________________ $20.00 CE (38)(39) Injunction proceedings CF ___________________________________________________ $20.00 CG (39)(40) Improve real property, petition to CH ___________________________________________________ $20.00 CI (40)(41) Inventory with appraisement CJ ___________________________________________________ $10.00 CK (41)(42) Inventory without appraisement CL ___________________________________________________ $7.00 CM (42)(43) Investment or expenditure of funds, application for CN ___________________________________________________ $10.00 CO (43)(44) Invest in real property, application to CP ___________________________________________________ $10.00 CQ (44)(45) Lease for oil, gas, coal, or other mineral, petition to CR ___________________________________________________ $20.00 CS (45)(46) Lease or lease and improve real property, petition to CT ___________________________________________________ $20.00 CU (46)(47) Marriage license CV ___________________________________________________ $10.00 CW Certified abstract of each marriage CX ___________________________________________________ $2.00 CY (47)(48) Minor or incompetent person, etc., disposal of estate under twenty-five thousand dollars of CZ ___________________________________________________ $10.00 DA (48)(49) Mortgage or mortgage and repair or improve real property, complaint to DB ___________________________________________________ $20.00 DC (49)(50) Newly discovered assets, report of DD ___________________________________________________ $7.00 DE (50)(51) Nonresident executor or administrator to bar creditors' claims, proceedings by DF ___________________________________________________ $20.00 DG (51)(52) Power of attorney or revocation of power, bonding company DH ___________________________________________________ $10.00 DI (52)(53) Presumption of death, petition to establish DJ ___________________________________________________ $20.00 DK (53)(54) Probating will DL ___________________________________________________ $15.00 DM Proof of notice to beneficiaries DN ___________________________________________________ $5.00 DO (54)(55) Purchase personal property, application of surviving spouse to DP ___________________________________________________ $10.00 DQ (55)(56) Purchase real property at appraised value, petition of surviving spouse to DR ___________________________________________________ $20.00 DS (56)(57) Receipts in addition to advertising charges, application and order to record DT ___________________________________________________ $5.00 DU Record of those receipts, additional, per page DV ___________________________________________________ $1.00 DW (57)(58) Record in excess of fifteen hundred words in any proceeding in the probate court, per page DX ___________________________________________________ $1.00 DY (58)(59) Release of estate by mortgagee or other lienholder DZ ___________________________________________________ $5.00 EA (59)(60) Relieving an estate from administration under section 2113.03 of the Revised Code or granting an order for a summary release from administration under section 2113.031 of the Revised Code EB ___________________________________________________ $60.00 EC (60)(61) Removal of fiduciary, application for ED ___________________________________________________ $10.00 EE (61)(62) Requalification of executor or administrator EF ___________________________________________________ $10.00 EG (62)(63) Resignation of fiduciary EH ___________________________________________________ $5.00 EI (63)(64) Sale bill, public sale of personal property EJ ___________________________________________________ $10.00 EK (64)(65) Sale of personal property and report, application for EL ___________________________________________________ $10.00 EM (65)(66) Sale of real property, petition for EN ___________________________________________________ $25.00 EO (66)(67) Terminate guardianship, petition to EP ___________________________________________________ $10.00 EQ (67)(68) Transfer of real property, application, entry, and certificate for ER ___________________________________________________ $7.00 ES (68)(69) Unclaimed money, application to invest ET ___________________________________________________ $7.00 EU (69)(70) Vacate approval of account or order of distribution, motion to EV ___________________________________________________ $10.00 EW (70)(71) Writ of execution EX ___________________________________________________ $5.00 EY (71)(72) Writ of possession EZ ___________________________________________________ $5.00 FA (72)(73) Wrongful death, application and settlement of claim for FB ___________________________________________________ $20.00 FC (73)(74) Year's allowance, petition to review FD ___________________________________________________ $7.00 FE (74)(75) Guardian's report, filing and review of FF ___________________________________________________ $5.00 FG (75)(76) Person with a mental illness subject to court order, filing of affidavit and proceedings for FH ___________________________________________________ $25.00 (B)(1) In relation to an application for the appointment of a guardian or the review of a report of a guardian under section 2111.49 of the Revised Code, the probate court, pursuant to court order or in accordance with a court rule, may direct that the applicant or the estate pay any or all of the expenses of an investigation conducted pursuant to section 2111.041 or division (A)(2) of section 2111.49 of the Revised Code. If the investigation is conducted by a public employee or investigator who is paid by the county, the fees for the investigation shall be paid into the county treasury. If the court finds that an alleged incompetent or a ward is indigent, the court may waive the costs, fees, and expenses of an investigation. (2) In relation to the appointment or functioning of a guardian for a minor or the guardianship of a minor, the probate court may direct that the applicant or the estate pay any or all of the expenses of an investigation conducted pursuant to section 2111.042 of the Revised Code. If the investigation is conducted by a public employee or investigator who is paid by the county, the fees for the investigation shall be paid into the county treasury. If the court finds that the guardian or applicant is indigent, the court may waive the costs, fees, and expenses of an investigation. (3) In relation to the filing of an affidavit of mental illness for a person with a mental illness subject to court order, the court may waive the fee under division (A)(75)(A)(76) of this section if the court finds that the affiant is indigent or for good cause shown. (C) Thirty dollars of the thirty-five-dollar fee collected pursuant to division (A)(34)(A)(35) of this section and twenty dollars of the sixty-dollar fee collected pursuant to division (A)(59)(A)(60) of this section shall be deposited by the county treasurer in the indigent guardianship fund created pursuant to section 2111.51 of the Revised Code. (D) The fees of witnesses, jurors, sheriffs, coroners, and constables for services rendered in the probate court or by order of the probate judge shall be the same as provided for similar services in the court of common pleas. (E) The probate court, by rule, may require an advance deposit for costs, not to exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars, at the time application is made for an appointment as executor or administrator or at the time a will is presented for probate. (F)(1) The "putative father registry fund" is hereby created in the state treasury. The department of children and youth shall use the money in the fund to fund the department's costs of performing its duties related to the putative father registry established under section 3107.062 of the Revised Code. (2) If the department determines that money in the putative father registry fund is more than is needed for its duties related to the putative father registry, the department may use the surplus moneys in the fund as permitted in division (D) of section 2151.3527 or section 5103.155 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2101.162. (A)(1) The probate judge may determine that, for the efficient operation of the probate court, additional funds are required to computerize the court, make available computerized legal research services, or to do both. Upon making a determination that additional funds are required for either or both of those purposes, the probate judge shall charge a fee not to exceed three dollars or authorize and direct a deputy clerk of the probate court to charge a fee not to exceed three dollars, in addition to the fees specified in divisions (A)(1), (3), (4), (6), (14) to (17), (20) to (25), (27)(28), (30)(31) to (32)(33), (34), (35), (36), (37)(38) to (48)(49), (50)(51) to (55)(56), (59)(60) to (61)(62), (63)(64) to (66)(67), (69)(70), and (72)(73) of section 2101.16 of the Revised Code and the fee charged in connection with the docketing and indexing of an appeal. (2) All moneys collected under division (A)(1) of this section shall be paid to the county treasurer. The treasurer shall place the moneys from the fees in a separate fund to be disbursed, upon an order of the probate judge, in an amount no greater than the actual cost to the court of procuring and maintaining computerization of the court, computerized legal research services, or both. (3) If the court determines that the funds in the fund described in division (A)(2) of this section are more than sufficient to satisfy the purpose for which the additional fee described in division (A)(1) of this section was imposed, the court may declare a surplus in the fund and expend those surplus funds for other appropriate technological expenses of the court. (B)(1) The probate judge may determine that, for the efficient operation of the probate court, additional funds are required to computerize the office of the clerk of the court and, upon that determination, may charge a fee, not to exceed ten dollars, or authorize and direct a deputy clerk of the probate court to charge a fee, not to exceed ten dollars, in addition to the fees specified in divisions (A)(1), (3), (4), (6), (14) to (17), (20) to (25), (27)(28), (30)(31) to (32)(33), (34)(35), (35)(36), (37)(38) to (48)(49), (50)(51) to (55)(56), (59)(60) to (61)(62), (63)(64) to (66)(67), (69)(70), and (72)(73) of section 2101.16 of the Revised Code and the fee charged in connection with the docketing and indexing of an appeal. Subject to division (B)(2) of this section, all moneys collected under this division shall be paid to the county treasurer to be disbursed, upon an order of the probate judge and subject to appropriation by the board of county commissioners, in an amount no greater than the actual cost to the probate court of procuring and maintaining computer systems for the office of the clerk of the court. (2) If the probate judge makes the determination described in division (B)(1) of this section, the board of county commissioners may issue one or more general obligation bonds for the purpose of procuring and maintaining the computer systems for the office of the clerk of the probate court. In addition to the purposes stated in division (B)(1) of this section for which the moneys collected under that division may be expended, the moneys additionally may be expended to pay debt charges on and financing costs related to any general obligation bonds issued pursuant to this division as they become due. General obligation bonds issued pursuant to this division are Chapter 133. securities. Sec. 2111.03. (A) A person applying for appointment as a guardian, including, but not limited to, as a limited guardian, pursuant to section 2111.02 of the Revised Code, shall file with the probate court an application that contains a statement of the whole estate of the ward, its probable value, and the probable annual rents of the ward's real property, and that also contains the following: (A)(1) A statement whether the applicant ever has been charged with or convicted of any crime involving theft, physical violence, or sexual, alcohol, or substance abuse, and, if the applicant has been so charged or convicted, the date and place of each charge and each conviction; (B)(2) A statement whether a limited guardianship is sought and, if sought, a specification of the limited powers that are requested and a statement whether the limited guardianship is to be for a definite or indefinite period; (C)(3) In the case of an application for the appointment of a guardian of a minor, all of the following: (1)(a) Name, age, and residence of the minor; (2)(b) Name and residence of each parent of the minor; (3)(c) Name, degree of kinship, age, and address of next of kin of the minor, if no parent is living or if a parent of the minor is absent, under disability, or for other reason cannot be notified; (4)(d) Name and residence address of the person having custody of the minor. (D)(4) In the case of an application for the appointment of a guardian of an alleged incompetent, all of the following: (1)(a) Name, age, and residence of the person for whom such appointment is sought; (2)(b) Facts upon which the application is based; (3)(c) Name, degree of kinship, age, and address of the next of kin of the alleged incompetent. (B) The court, on its own motion, shall proceed as provided in this chapter, upon suggestion by the bureau of workers' compensation that any person who has made application for or been awarded compensation or death benefits as an employee or the dependent of a killed employee is a minor or incompetent. In that case, no application need be filed and the bureau shall furnish the court with the name and residence of such person and the name, degree of kinship, age, and address of the father, mother, or next of kin of such person insofar as known by the bureau. (C) A parent or legal custodian may apply for guardianship of the applicant's incompetent adult child at any time after the child reaches seventeen years and six months of age. The applicant shall notify the probate court if the child is the subject of a pending proceeding or a court order to allocate parental rights and responsibilities. If the child is the subject of such a pending proceeding or court order at the time of the filing of the application, the applicant shall serve a copy of the guardianship hearing notice upon the court with jurisdiction over the proceeding or court order. Sec. 2111.121. (A) A person may nominate in a writing, as described in this division, another person to be the guardian of the nominator's person, estate, or both or the guardian of the person, the estate, or both, of one or more of the nominator's minor or incompetent adult children, whether born at the time of the execution of the writing or afterward, subject to notice and a hearing pursuant to section 2111.02 of the Revised Code. The nomination is for consideration by a court if proceedings for the appointment of a guardian of the person, the estate, or both, for the person making the nomination or if proceedings for the appointment of a guardian as the guardian of the person, the estate, or both of one or more of the nominator's minor or incompetent adult children are commenced at a later time. The person may authorize, in a writing of that nature, the person nominated as guardian to nominate a successor guardian for consideration by a court. The person also may direct, in a writing of that nature, that bond be waived for a person nominated as guardian in it or nominated as a successor guardian in accordance with an authorization in it. To be effective as a nomination, the writing shall be signed by the person making the nomination in the presence of two witnesses; signed by the witnesses; and contain, immediately prior to their signatures, an attestation of the witnesses that the person making the nomination signed the writing in their presence; or be acknowledged by the person making the nomination before a notary public. (B) A person's nomination, in a writing as described in division (A) of this section, of a guardian of the nominator's person, estate, or both or of a guardian of the person, the estate, or both of one or more of the nominator's minor children or incompetent adult children is revoked by the person's subsequent nomination, in a writing as described in division (A) of this section, of a guardian of the nominator's person, estate, or both or of a guardian of the person, the estate, or both of one or more of the nominator's minor children or incompetent adult children, and, except for good cause shown or disqualification, the court shall make its appointment in accordance with the person's most recent nomination. If the writing contains a waiver of bond, the court shall waive bond of the person nominated as guardian unless it is of the opinion that the interest of the trust demands it. (C) Nomination of a person as a guardian or successor guardian of the person, the estate, or both of one or more of the nominator's minor or incompetent adult children under division (A) of this section, and any subsequent appointment of the guardian or successor guardian as guardian under section 2111.02 of the Revised Code, does not vacate the jurisdiction of any other court that previously may have exercised jurisdiction over the person of the minor or incompetent adult child. (D) The writing containing the nomination of a person to be the guardian of the person, the estate, or both of one or more of the nominator's minor or incompetent adult children under division (A) of this section may be filed with the probate court for safekeeping, and the probate court shall designate the nomination as the nomination of a standby guardian. (E) The nomination of a person to be the guardian of the nominator's incompetent adult child under division (A) of this section may be filed at any time after the child reaches seventeen years and six months of age. (F) A nominator of a person to be the guardian of the nominator's minor or incompetent adult children may file a guardianship nomination at the probate court of the county where the minor or incompetent adult children reside. Sec. 2111.51. Each county shall establish in the county treasury an indigent guardianship fund. All revenue that the general assembly appropriates to the indigent guardianship fund for a county, thirty dollars of the thirty-five-dollar fee collected pursuant to division (A)(34)(A)(35) of section 2101.16 of the Revised Code, and twenty dollars of the sixty-dollar fee collected pursuant to division (A)(59)()(A)(60) of that section shall be deposited into the fund that is established in that county. Expenditures from the fund shall be made only upon order of the probate judge and only for payment of any cost, fee, charge, or expense associated with the establishment, opening, maintenance, or termination of a guardianship for an indigent ward. If a probate court determines that there are reasonably sufficient funds in the indigent guardianship fund of the county in which the court is located to meet the needs of indigent guardianships in that county, the court, by order, may declare a surplus in the indigent guardianship fund and expend the surplus funds for other guardianship expenses or for other court purposes. Sec. 2113.031. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Financial institution" has the same meaning as in section 5725.01 of the Revised Code. "Financial institution" also includes a credit union and a fiduciary that is not a trust company but that does trust business. (2) "Funeral and burial expenses" means whichever of the following applies: (a) The funeral and burial expenses of the decedent that are included in the bill of a funeral director; (b) The funeral expenses of the decedent that are not included in the bill of a funeral director and that have been approved by the probate court; (c) The funeral and burial expenses of the decedent that are described in divisions (A)(2)(a) and (b) of this section. (3) "Surviving spouse" means either of the following: (a) The surviving spouse of a decedent who died leaving the surviving spouse and no minor children; (b) The surviving spouse of a decedent who died leaving the surviving spouse and minor children, all of whom are children of the decedent and the surviving spouse. (B)(1) If the value of the assets of the decedent's estate does not exceed the lesser of five thousand dollars or the amount of the decedent's funeral and burial expenses, any person who is not a surviving spouse and who has paid or is obligated in writing to pay the decedent's funeral and burial expenses, including a person described in section 2108.89 of the Revised Code, may apply to the probate court for an order granting a summary release from administration in accordance with this section. (2) If either of the following applies, the decedent's surviving spouse may apply to the probate court for an order granting a summary release from administration in accordance with this section: (a) The decedent's funeral and burial expenses have been prepaid, and the value of the assets of the decedent's estate does not exceed the total of the following items: (i) The allowance for support that is made under division (A) of section 2106.13 of the Revised Code to the surviving spouse and, if applicable, to the decedent's minor children and that is distributable in accordance with division (B)(1) or (2) of that section; (ii) An amount, not exceeding five thousand dollars, for the decedent's funeral and burial expenses referred to in division (A)(2)(c) of this section. (b) The decedent's funeral and burial expenses have not been prepaid, the decedent's surviving spouse has paid or is obligated in writing to pay the decedent's funeral and burial expenses, and the value of the assets of the decedent's estate does not exceed the total of the items referred to in divisions (B)(2)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section. (C) A probate court shall order a summary release from administration in connection with a decedent's estate only if the court finds that all of the following are satisfied: (1) A person described in division (B)(1) of this section is the applicant for a summary release from administration, and the value of the assets of the decedent's estate does not exceed the lesser of five thousand dollars or the amount of the decedent's funeral and burial expenses, or the applicant for a summary release from administration is the decedent's surviving spouse, and the circumstances described in division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of this section apply. (2) The application for a summary release from administration does all of the following: (a) Describes all assets of the decedent's estate that are known to the applicant; (b) Is in the form that the supreme court prescribes pursuant to its powers of superintendence under Section 5 of Article IV, Ohio Constitution, and is consistent with the requirements of this division; (c) Has been signed and acknowledged by the applicant in the presence of a notary public or a deputy clerk of the probate court; (d) Sets forth the following information if the decedent's estate includes a described type of asset: (i) If the decedent's estate includes a motor vehicle, the motor vehicle's year, make, model, body type, manufacturer's vehicle identification number, certificate of title number, and date of death value; (ii) If the decedent's estate includes an account maintained by a financial institution, that institution's name and the account's complete identifying number and date of death balance; (iii) If the decedent's estate includes one or more shares of stock or bonds, the total number of the shares and bonds and their total date of death value and, for each share or bond, its serial number, the name of its issuer, its date of death value, and, if any, the name and address of its transfer agent. (3) The application for a summary release from administration is accompanied by all of the following that apply: (a) A receipt, contract, written declaration as defined in section 2108.70 of the Revised Code, or other document that confirms the applicant's payment or obligation to pay the decedent's funeral and burial expenses or, if applicable in the case of the decedent's surviving spouse, the prepayment of the decedent's funeral and burial expenses; (b) An application for a certificate of transfer as described in section 2113.61 of the Revised Code, if an interest in real property is included in the assets of the decedent's estate; (c) The fee required by division (A)(59)(A)(60) of section 2101.16 of the Revised Code. (4) At the time of its determination on the application, there are no pending proceedings for the administration of the decedent's estate and no pending proceedings for relief of the decedent's estate from administration under section 2113.03 of the Revised Code. (5) At the time of its determination on the application, there are no known assets of the decedent's estate other than the assets described in the application. (D) If the probate court determines that the requirements of division (C) of this section are satisfied, the probate court shall issue an order that grants a summary release from administration in connection with the decedent's estate. The order has, and shall specify that it has, all of the following effects: (1) It relieves the decedent's estate from administration. (2) It directs the delivery to the applicant of the decedent's personal property together with the title to that property. (3) It directs the transfer to the applicant of the title to any interests in real property included in the decedent's estate. (4) It eliminates the need for a financial institution, corporation, or other entity or person referred to in any provision of divisions (A) to (F) of section 5731.39 of the Revised Code to obtain, as otherwise would be required by any of those divisions, the written consent of the tax commissioner prior to the delivery, transfer, or payment to the applicant of an asset of the decedent's estate. (E) A certified copy of an order that grants a summary release from administration together with a certified copy of the application for that order constitutes sufficient authority for a financial institution, corporation, or other entity or person referred to in divisions (A) to (F) of section 5731.39 of the Revised Code or for a clerk of a court of common pleas to transfer title to an asset of the decedent's estate to the applicant for the summary release from administration. (F) This section does not affect the ability of qualified persons to file an application to relieve an estate from administration under section 2113.03 of the Revised Code or to file an application for the grant of letters testamentary or letters of administration in connection with the decedent's estate. Sec. 3109.044. (A) As used in this section, "person with a disability" has the same meaning as in section 3119.10 of the Revised Code. (B) When a person with a disability is the subject of a pending proceeding or a court order to allocate parental rights and responsibilities and has reached the age of majority, the court shall retain jurisdiction of the allocation or parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the person with a disability until a probate court has issued a final order appointing a guardian for the person with a disability pursuant to Chapter 2111. of the Revised Code. The court having jurisdiction shall address and issue any necessary final appealable orders prior to transferring or terminating jurisdiction of the parental rights and responsibilities for care of the person with a disability. (C) Except as provided under division (I) of section 3109.04 of the Revised Code, any existing order allocating parental rights and responsibilities for the care of, or parenting time rights or visitation and companionship rights with, the person with a disability shall remain in effect until the probate court has issued a final order appointing the guardian for the person with a disability under Chapter 2111. of the Revised Code. (D) The court having jurisdiction shall prohibit either parent from canceling or making changes to any existing health care coverage or public assistance benefits for the person with a disability while the proceeding to appoint a guardian for the person with a disability is pending. (E) The court having jurisdiction may appoint a guardian ad litem for the person with a disability who is the subject of a proceeding or order for the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities for or parenting time rights or visitation and companionship rights until the probate court issues a final order appointing a guardian for the person with a disability. If the court having jurisdiction has appointed a guardian ad litem for the person with a disability, the guardian ad litem shall conduct an investigation without bias against the gender of the parent or the person with a disability. The guardian ad litem shall thoroughly review all case filings, including any previous reports by a guardian ad litem. A guardian ad litem appointed under this division shall bill for costs based on the time the guardian ad litem spends reviewing or discussing information relevant to the case. If the court requires a deposit for the guardian ad litem, the costs shall be capped at the amount the court assigns for the deposit, unless a party requests and accepts responsibility of payment for additional time with the guardian ad litem. The court having jurisdiction shall allocate payment by each party for the guardian ad litem in proportion to the time spent with each parent. Upon approving the final order for payment, the court shall order the entity holding the deposit to issue a refund of any remaining deposit funds. Section 2. That existing sections 2101.16, 2101.162, 2111.03, 2111.121, 2111.51, and 2113.031 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. This act shall be known as the Parker Kahle Act.